web/comori-od-es/hunspell/ro_simple/ro_simple.aff
# word list version 3.3.7
SET UTF-8
TRY iaertolncusampdbgtfzvshajixkwyqACDM
KEY qwertyuiop|asdfghjkl|zxcvbnm

#***************************************
# Romanian Hunspell Dictionary
# Copyright (C) 2005-2009 Rospell Team, http://rospell.sourceforge.net
#***************************************
# Authors:
#   Lucian Constantin (rospell) <struct_bylighting at yahoo dot com>
#   Andrei Cipu <strainu10@gmail.com>
#   Sorin Sbarnea (http://www.i18n.ro)
#   Alexandru Szasz (Mozilla and OpenOffice.org Romanian Translation Team)
#   Ionut Paduraru (http://www.archeus.ro)
#   Adrian Stoica (OpenOffice.org Romanian Translation Team) <adrian dot stoica at cuvinte dot ro>
#   Nicu Buculei (OpenOffice.org Romanian Translation Team) <nicu at apsro dot com>
#   Catalin Francu (http://dexonline.ro)
#   Ionel Mugurel Ciobica (previous aspell releases) <tgakic at sg10 chem tue nl>
#   Mihai Budiu (ispell dictionary) <mihaib at cs cmu edu>
#
# Copyright Terms:
#  GPL 2.0/LGPL 2.1/MPL 1.1 tri-license
#
#***************************************
# Cuprins:
# O - general prefix re
#
# Verbe:
# N - general sufix verbe gerunziu
# K - verbe conj 1.1, terminate in a la infinitiv, insa nu in ez la pers I sing (v1.utf8)
#    - automatic prefix re
# B - verbe conj 1.2,  terminate in a la infinitiv si ez la pers I sing (v1.utf8)
#    - automatic prefix re
# EHG - verbe conj 3, terminate in e la infinitiv (v3.utf8)
#    - automatic prefix re
# I - verbe conjugarea 4, terminate in i sau i la infinitiv (v4.utf8)
#   - numai conjugarile 4.2 (terminare esc pers I sing) si 4.4 (asc) sunt implementate
#   - automatic prefix re
#
# Substantive
# AFfRrsu - feminine (sf.utf8)
# C - neutre care fac plural in uri: abajur/abajururi (sn.utf8)
# c - neutre cu defect de plural
# MP - neutre care fac pluralul in e: sablon/sabloane (sn.utf8)
# z - neutre cu oa
# L - masculine (sm.utf8)
# l - masculine cu defect de plural
#
# Adjective
# DQST - adjective (adj.utf8)
#       - check overlap between Q and S
#       - e - adjective terminate in e, care au aceeasi forma la sing m si f
#       - t - adjective terminate in et
#       -q - adjective terminate in fag
#       - automatic prefix ne
#
# Nume proprii
# U - feminine
# T - masculine
#
# Neologisme
# n - substantive neutre
#********************************************************************************

#********************************************************************************
# adjective terminate in et
SFX t Y 17
SFX t 0 u et
SFX t 0 ul et
SFX t 0 ului et
SFX t 0 ule et
SFX t 0 i et
SFX t 0 ii et
SFX t 0 ilor et
SFX t et eata [^i]et
SFX t et eata [^i]et
SFX t et eato [^i]et
SFX t et ata iet
SFX t et ata iet
SFX t et ato iet
SFX t 0 ei et
SFX t 0 e et
SFX t 0 ele et
SFX t 0 elor et

#********************************************************************************
# adjective terminate in e, care au aceeasi forma la sing m si f
SFX e Y 15
SFX e 0 le e
SFX e 0 lui e
SFX e e i [^td]e
SFX e e ii [^td]e
SFX e e ilor [^td]e
SFX e de zi de
SFX e de zii de
SFX e de zilor de
SFX e te ti te
SFX e te tii te
SFX e te tilor te
SFX e 0 a e
SFX e 0 i e
SFX e 0 le e
SFX e 0 lor e
PFX e Y 1
PFX e 0 ne .

#********************************************************************************
# neologisme subst neutru: cd-ul, cd-uri
SFX n Y 5
SFX n -ul 0 -ul
SFX n -ul -ului -ul
SFX n -ul -uri -ul
SFX n -ul -urile -ul
SFX n -ul -urilor -ul

# prefix re
PFX O Y 1
PFX O 0 re .


#********************************************************************************
# verbe gerunziu
SFX N Y 14
SFX N 0 u-ma d
SFX N 0 u-te d
SFX N 0 u-l d
SFX N 0 -o d
SFX N 0 u-se d
SFX N 0 u-si d
SFX N 0 u-si-o d
SFX N 0 u-si-l d
SFX N 0 u-si-le d
SFX N 0 u-si-i d
SFX N 0 u-ne d
SFX N 0 u-va d
SFX N 0 u-i d
SFX N 0 u-le d


#********************************************************************************
# verbe conj 1.1, terminate in a la infinitiv, insa nu in ez la pers I sing (v1/K)
SFX K Y 133
SFX K ac aci ac
SFX K at ati at
SFX K st sti st
SFX K rt rti rt
SFX K pt pti pt
SFX K nc nci nc
SFX K ec eci ec
SFX K rc rci rc
SFX K oc oci oc
SFX K sc sti sc
SFX K sc sti sc
SFX K ut uti ut
SFX K ct cti ct
SFX K lt lti lt
SFX K d zi ed
SFX K d zi ud
SFX K ad ezi ad
SFX K it iti it
SFX K ic ici ic
SFX K t ti nt
SFX K d zi nd
SFX K 0 i [^tcdu]
SFX K 0 a [^u]
SFX K 0 a-ma [^u]
SFX K 0 a-te [^u]
SFX K 0 a-l [^u]
SFX K 0 a-o [^u]
SFX K 0 a-ne [^u]
SFX K 0 ati-va [^u]
SFX K 0 a-i [^u]
SFX K 0 a-le [^u]
SFX K 0 am [^u]
SFX K 0 ati [^u]
SFX K 0 ati-ma [^u]
SFX K 0 ati-va [^u]
SFX K 0 ati-o [^u]
SFX K 0 ati-l [^u]
SFX K 0 ati-ne [^u]
SFX K 0 ati-i [^u]
SFX K 0 ati-le [^u]
SFX K 0 am [^u]
SFX K 0 ai [^u]
SFX K 0 a [^u]
SFX K 0 ati [^u]
SFX K 0 au [^u]
SFX K 0 and [^u]
SFX K 0 andu-ma [^u]
SFX K 0 andu-te [^u]
SFX K 0 andu-l [^u]
SFX K 0 and-o [^u]
SFX K 0 andu-se [^u]
SFX K 0 andu-si [^u]
SFX K 0 andu-si-o [^u]
SFX K 0 andu-si-l [^u]
SFX K 0 andu-si-le [^u]
SFX K 0 andu-ne [^u]
SFX K 0 andu-va [^u]
SFX K 0 andu-i [^u]
SFX K 0 andu-le [^u]
SFX K 0 at  [^u]
SFX K 0 at-o  [^u]
SFX K 0 asem [^u]
SFX K 0 asesi [^u]
SFX K 0 ase [^u]
SFX K 0 aseti [^u]
SFX K 0 asera [^u]
SFX K 0 aseram [^u]
SFX K 0 aserati [^u]
SFX K 0 a [^u]
SFX K 0 at [^u]
SFX K 0 ai [^u]
SFX K 0 asi [^u]
SFX K 0 a [^u]
SFX K 0 aram [^u]
SFX K 0 arati [^u]
SFX K 0 ara [^u]
SFX K u i u
SFX K u a u
SFX K u a-ma u
SFX K u a-te u
SFX K u a-l u
SFX K u a-o u
SFX K u a-ne u
SFX K u ati-va u
SFX K u a-i u
SFX K u a-le u
SFX K u am u
SFX K u ati u
SFX K u ati-ma u
SFX K u ati-va u
SFX K u ati-o u
SFX K u ati-l u
SFX K u ati-ne u
SFX K u ati-i u
SFX K u ati-le u
SFX K u am u
SFX K u ai u
SFX K u a u
SFX K u ati u
SFX K u au u
SFX K u and u
SFX K u andu-ma u
SFX K u andu-te u
SFX K u andu-l u
SFX K u and-o u
SFX K u andu-se u
SFX K u andu-si u
SFX K u andu-si-o u
SFX K u andu-si-l u
SFX K u andu-si-le u
SFX K u andu-ne u
SFX K u andu-va u
SFX K u andu-i u
SFX K u andu-le u
SFX K u at  u
SFX K u at-o  u
SFX K u asem u
SFX K u asesi u
SFX K u ase u
SFX K u aseti u
SFX K u asera u
SFX K u aseram u
SFX K u aserati u
SFX K u a u
SFX K u at u
SFX K u ai u
SFX K u asi u
SFX K u a u
SFX K u aram u
SFX K u arati u
SFX K u ara u
SFX K u e u
SFX K 0 e [^u]

PFX K Y 1
PFX K 0 re .
#end********************************************************************************
