web/comori-od-es/hunspell/ro_simple/ro_simple.dic
abrog/K
absorbiram/O
abaturati/O
acceptaseram/O
acetific/K
acoperita/O
acufund/K
acutizand/N
admir/K
adormea/O
adun/K
adaugasesi/O
adaugand/NO
aflu/K
afurc/K
agatase/O
airbag-ul/n
alerg/K
alergam/O
aliniind/N
alunec/K
ambusc/K
amuz/K
antifonand/N
anunt/K
apasa-le/O
api-ul/n
aplecati-i/O
aplic/K
apropriati-l/O
aparaseti/O
apara-l/O
apasand/NO
ardic/K
argintind/N
artwork-ul/n
arat/K
ascutara/O
asfintind/N
asigur/K
astup/K
atac/K
atrage-i/O
atroce/e
autoacuz/K
autoafirmand/N
autodenunt/K
autoobserv/K
auzind/NO
asezai/O
atat/K
baga-i/O
bandwidth-ul/n
baseball-ul/n
benchmark-ul/n
beand/NO
bip-ul/n
blitzkreig-ul/n
bluff-ul/n
bonific/K
bonus-ul/n
boot-loader-ul/n
bootloader-ul/n
bootsplash-ul/n
bornand/N
botezasi/O
bridging-ul/n
browser-ul/n
buciumand/N
bug-report-ul/n
bugraport-ul/n
buric/K
business-ul/n
bytecode-ul/n
bataind/N
bau/O
cac/K
calcifiind/N
call-ul/n
card-ul/n
cat/K
cauta-te/O
cd-ul/n
cdrom-ul/n
cert/K
certand/N
certaret/t
chamois-ul/n
chart-ul/n
chasse-ul/n
chateaubriand-ul/n
chemat-o/O
chewing-gum-ul/n
cine-verite-ul/n
circul/K
citet/t
clip-ul/n
clipotind/N
clatinam/O
coborand/NO
cocktail-ul/n
codific/K
combin/K
combo-ul/n
combateti-ma/O
combatand/NO
comport/K
concedand/N
condamn/K
config-ul/n
confund/K
consacrand/N
consider/K
consimtiserati/O
consum/K
contraindic/K
contravenind/N
convocati-ne/O
copyright-ul/n
coscovind/N
crash-ul/n
crescusera/O
critic/K
css-ul/n
cufundand/N
cuget/K
cumparasi/O
curat/K
cuseram/O
cainind/N
calaret/t
capatat/O
cascam/O
cautand/NO
catara/O
daemon-ul/n
debarc/K
declin/K
decomandand/N
dedic/K
degajand/N
degazific/K
dejoc/K
delegat-o/O
delegand/NO
demask/K
denazific/K
denunt/K
depanand/N
descalec/K
descoperiti-o/O
descosand/NO
descurc/K
descurcaret/t
descuse/O
descarcand/N
descarcam/O
desfasurati-ma/O
deshamand/N
desic/K
design-ul/n
desk-ul/n
despiedic/K
destinzand/N
detoxific/K
deux-pieces-ul/n
devenind/NO
deveniti/O
device-ul/n
dezechilibrand/N
dezintoxic/K
dezlegati-i/O
dezlegand/NO
desertand/N
difer/K
dirt-track-ul/n
disip/K
display-ul/n
displacand/N
divulg/K
dizlocati-i/O
doborand/NO
dot-com-ul/n
drumet/t
ducaret/t
dulce/e
durific/K
dvd-ul/n
dand/NO
eficace/e
ego-ul/n
electrific/K
erbacee/e
escarific/K
evit/K
execut/K
expir/K
extermin/K
extirpand/N
faci/O
falsific/K
fast-food-ul/n
feroce/e
fierbinte/e
firewall-ul/n
flame-war-ul/n
flet/t
floppy-ul/n
fluier/K
fps-ul/n
frec/K
frematand/N
fur/K
faceati/O
gadget-ul/n
germinand/N
ghetto-ul/n
glorific/K
gui-ul/n
harddisc-ul/n
header-ul/n
hobby-ul/n
hopaind/N
hraparet/t
html-ul/n
icon-ul/n
identific/K
ierata-te/O
imnific/K
impacientand/N
impurific/K
indic/K
ineficace/e
inflamand/N
installer-ul/n
intensific/K
intervenind/N
intrasera/O
intrig/K
irit/K
istet/t
iubet/t
iute/e
joystick-ul/n
jucandu-si/O
jupuind/N
justific/K
keylogger-ul/n
know-how-ul/n
legati/O
limpede/e
link-ul/n
livecd-ul/n
logo-ul/n
luati-va/O
lunec/K
laiet/t
lapadand/N
lataret/t
mainframe-ul/n
markup-ul/n
mestec/K
metiland/N
mistret/t
misc/K
motrice/e
motto-ul/n
mucegaind/N
multicast-ul/n
multiplic/K
mureau/O
musc/K
mancand/NO
mangaiati-ne/O
macinand/N
malaiet/t
masurarati/O
nazific/K
neadmitand/ON
nefolosind/N
nelasai/O
nemaiputeti-i/O
nemaiputand/N
nepotrivind/N
netmask-ul/n
neurastenizand/N
newsletter-ul/n
neinvata-te/O
nitrific/K
notepad-ul/n
numarati-ne/O
numarand/NO
nataflet/t
oblig/K
ofereind/NO
ofera-ma/O
oprim/K
painjenind/N
palmtop-ul/n
palpit/K
parvenisi/O
patch-ul/n
penalty-ul/n
personific/K
perspicace/e
petrecaret/t
piaptanand/NO
pier/K
pierde-ne/O
pinball-ul/n
pipaiti-l/O
piscuind/N
pizmaret/t
plimbaret/t
plouand/N
plug-in/n
plangaret/t
placu/O
posed/K
precoce/e
predaserati/O
predefinind/N
preincuband/N
preluau/O
prenotific/K
prenumarand/N
prevenind/NO
prevazuserati/O
pricepu/O
priind/N
propag/K
propice/e
pradat-o/O
pradand/NO
pursange/e
purtaret/t
pustiind/N
puteti-va/O
putrific/K
paduret/t
painjenind/N
quark-ul/n
rabda-o/O
ramificand/N
rapace/e
readauga-o/O
reafiliind/N
reagatam/O
reaplecati-ma/O
reaplecand/NO
rece/e
recumparand/NO
refractand/N
refresh-ul/n
refaceti-ne/O
reific/K
rejectand/N
renascand/NO
reprezentat-o/O
restart-ul/n
restaurand/N
retragem/O
revendicand/N
revoc/K
reinarmand/N
reincarci/O
reincarcati-ne/O
reinscriind/N
risc/K
rog/O
rollback-ul/n
rugand/NO
rummy-ul/n
racanind/N
rascoase/O
rasculand/N
rasturnasi/O
rasarind/NO
razjudec/K
razlet/t
razand/NO
satisfa-ma/O
scanner-ul/n
scarificand/N
scote-le/O
scriind/NO
script-ul/n
scufund/K
scadeti-ma/O
scalambaind/N
seamanaseti/O
secretand/N
self-service-ul/n
semet/t
sfartecand/N
shell-ul/n
show-ul/n
silicific/K
simteti-ma/O
slash-ul/n
slow-fox-ul/n
smulgand/N
socket-ul/n
spargeti-l/O
speller-ul/n
spovaduind/N
spanzur/K
spasind/N
squash-ul/n
startup-ul/n
stick-ul/n
streamtuner-ul/n
strecoara-i/O
strejuind/N
strabatusem/O
stravad/K
staruind/N
subtire/e
sun/K
superman-ul/n
supraexcitand/N
surfing-ul/n
suscitand/N
saltai/O
saltaret/t
tab-ul/n
task-switching-ul/n
teletext-ul/n
tenace/e
tic-tac-ul/n
ticnind/N
toc/K
toolkit-ul/n
tracknumber-ul/n
trage-ne/O
tremur/K
tresarisem/O
tsunami-ul/n
tumefiind/N
twinning-ul/n
tacuram/O
ucigand/N
umblaret/t
umflu/K
uplink-ul/n
valorific/K
vedeti-ma/O
verde/e
verso-ul/n
vivace/e
vorace/e
vortex-ul/n
vremuind/N
vandut-o/O
vaicaret/t
vaitaret/t
varsam/O
wc-ul/n
webcam-ul/n
wizard-ul/n
xml-ul/n
zaharific/K
zapciind/N
zgaltaind/N
zvantur/K
zambaret/t
imbracaseti/O
imbracand/NO
imprumut/K
impuind/N
impartiti-l/O
incarc/O
inconjurand/N
incovrig/K
incredeti-ne/O
incalecati-va/O
incarcand/NO
indeamna/O
indesi/O
inec/K
infigaret/t
infasurati/O
infasand/NO
ingroapa-te/O
ingan/K
inhamam/O
inlantuind/N
inscrise/O
insurand/NO
intemeiat-o/O
intreaba-o/O
intrevada/O
intretesand/N
intampin/K
intarziati/O
invoise/O
invatati/O
inselati/O
intepara/O
intepand/ON
sugubet/t
suiet/t
tesu/O
